District of Columbia statutes.
44-553

Penalties for unauthorized released of criminal information.

(a)

Any person releasing or disclosing any information in violation of § 44-552(c) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punishable by the payment of a fine not greater than $300, a term of imprisonment not greater than 30 days, or both.

(b)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as sanctions for any violation of this subchapter or the rules issued pursuant to this subchapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

(c)

No facility shall be subject to civil liability that in good faith relies on a criminal background check to terminate, or to refuse to offer employment to, any individual.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-238, § 4, 46 DCR 881

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1353.